Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-428
Youth rehabilitation and treatment center; emergency plan.

(1) The Department of Health and Human Services shall develop an emergency plan for the Youth Rehabilitation and Treatment Center-Geneva, the Youth Rehabilitation and Treatment Center-Kearney, and any other facility operated and utilized as a youth rehabilitation and treatment center in compliance with state law.

(2) Each emergency plan shall:

(a) Identify and designate temporary placement facilities for the placement of juveniles in the event a youth rehabilitation and treatment center must be evacuated due to an emergency as defined in section 43-403. The administrator of a proposed temporary placement facility shall consent to be designated as a temporary placement facility in the emergency plan. A criminal detention facility or a juvenile detention facility shall only be designated as a temporary placement facility pursuant to section 43-430;

(b) Identify barriers to implementation of an effective emergency plan, including necessary administrative or legislative changes;

(c) Include procedures for the Office of Juvenile Services to provide reliable, effective, and timely notification that an emergency plan is to be implemented to:

(i) Staff at the youth rehabilitation and treatment center where the emergency plan is implemented and the administrator and staff at the temporary placement facility;

(ii) Juveniles placed at the youth rehabilitation and treatment center;

(iii) Families and legal guardians of juveniles placed at the youth rehabilitation and treatment center;

(iv) The State Court Administrator, in a form and manner prescribed by the State Court Administrator;

(v) The committing court of each juvenile placed at the youth rehabilitation and treatment center;

(vi) The chairperson of the Health and Human Services Committee of the Legislature; and

(vii) The office of Public Counsel and the office of Inspector General of Nebraska Child Welfare;

(d) Detail the plan for transportation of juveniles to a temporary placement facility; and

(e) Include methods and schedules for implementing the emergency plan.

(3) Each emergency plan shall be developed on or before December 15, 2020.

Laws 2020, LB1140, § 6.